Colorado statutes. TITLE 27 Behavioral Health
PART 4
EARLY INTERVENTION, DEFLECTION, AND REDIRECTION
FROM THE CRIMINAL JUSTICE SYSTEM GRANT PROGRAM

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 22-196, see section 1 of chapter 193, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.

27-60-401. Definitions.

As used in this part 4, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Behavioral health administration" or "BHA" means the behavioral health administration established in section 27-60-203.

"Community-based organization" means a nonprofit organization that is representative of the community served, or significant segments of the community served, and engaged in meeting that community's needs in the areas of social, human, or health services.

"Eligible entity" means:

A community-based organization;

A nonprofit hospital that provides behavioral health treatment;

A local government;

A federally recognized Indian tribe;

An office that provides or coordinates court-appointed counsel to represent indigent clients charged with a criminal offense in municipal or state court;

A federally qualified health center, as defined in the federal "Social Security Act", 42 U.S.C. sec. 1395x (aa)(4), that partners and submits a joint application with a community-based organization, nonprofit hospital that provides behavioral health treatment, local government, or federally recognized Indian tribe;

A rural health clinic, as defined in the federal "Social Security Act", 42 U.S.C. sec. 1395x (aa)(2), that partners and submits a joint application with a community-based organization, nonprofit hospital that provides behavioral health treatment, local government, or federally recognized Indian tribe; and

A local law enforcement agency, but only for the purpose of developing or expanding a co-responder community response program, as defined in section 24-32-3501 (8).

"Grant program" means the early intervention, deflection, and redirection from the criminal justice system grant program established in section 27-60-402.

"Local government" means a county, municipality, or city and county.

"Local law enforcement agency" means a county sheriff's office or a municipal police department.

"Review committee" means the early intervention, deflection, and redirection from the criminal justice system grant review committee created in section 27-60-403.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire part added, (SB 22-196), ch. 193, p. 1282, § 2, effective May 19.

27-60-402. Early intervention, deflection, and redirection from the criminal justice system grant program - established - permissible uses.

There is established in the behavioral health administration the early intervention, deflection, and redirection from the criminal justice system grant program to provide grants to eligible entities to fund programs and other strategies that:

Provide behavioral health treatment or resources to prevent individuals from becoming involved in the criminal justice system or further penetrating into the system;

Facilitate a direct community response to effectively respond to a person in a behavioral health crisis with the goal of preventing people with behavioral health needs from being arrested; or

After an arrest, redirect individuals with behavioral health needs, including individuals engaged in competency evaluation or restoration provided in a community setting and not in a jail-based setting, from the criminal justice system to appropriate community-based treatment and support services.

An early intervention, deflection, and redirection from the criminal justice system grant may be used for any of the following:

To support, create, or expand pre-arrest early intervention programs, including community-based alternative response programs described in section 24-32-3501 (8);

To support, create, or expand co-responder community response, as defined in section 24-32-3501 (8);

To fund enhanced staffing, facility improvements, or security measures for existing crisis walk-in centers, crisis stabilization units, mobile crisis services, or crisis respite services, as described in section 27-60-103 (1)(b), and withdrawal management programs at facilities approved pursuant to article 81 of this title 27. A crisis walk-in center must use a grant award to enable the crisis walk-in center to accept all behavioral health related first responder drop-offs and provide crisis receiving and stabilization services. Grants awarded for crisis stabilization units, mobile crisis services, crisis respite services, and withdrawal management programs must be used to provide crisis receiving and stabilization services.

Collaboration between community-based organizations and court-appointed counsel who represent indigent clients to facilitate behavioral health screening and assessment and to help clients access behavioral health and other supportive services, particularly during early stages in a criminal proceeding;

Comprehensive service delivery, including models where multiple partners co-locate or create new resource centers, to ensure swift connection to and receipt of social support services including, but not limited to, counseling, job placement services, housing navigation assistance and support, benefits enrollment, family counseling, substance use treatment, case management services, peer support, and other supportive services. To receive a grant for comprehensive service delivery, the applicant must demonstrate collaboration with local partners that will provide social support services as part of the comprehensive service delivery.

Comprehensive pre-release planning for individuals in a jail or prison with behavioral health needs, to prevent reincarceration;

To support, create, or expand programs to help people who have a pending municipal criminal case attend their court dates and avoid jail for non-appearance, such as through court reminders, ride assistance, or other supportive interventions. A program that operates with grant money must serve a substantial number of people with behavioral health needs.

To establish and operate, or fund an existing, mobile medication-assisted treatment unit;

Other innovations or programs aimed at deflecting, redirecting, or otherwise preventing people with behavioral health needs from further penetrating into the criminal justice system;

Technical assistance and capacity-building, as identified by the applicant as a component of the program, to support delivery of evidence-based or evidence-informed services along the behavioral health continuum of care; and

Capital expenditures related to providing the treatment and services described in this subsection (2).

The BHA shall provide grant recipients with information about the 988 crisis hotline, defined in section 27-64-102, to ensure that the grant recipients are aware of the services available by using the 988 crisis hotline.

The behavioral health administration shall administer the grant program in collaboration with the department of public safety. The BHA shall create a grant application process and shall make the process publicly available on its website prior to accepting applications. The BHA shall begin accepting grant applications no later than December 31, 2022.

The BHA and department of public safety shall engage in statewide community outreach to make eligible entities aware of the grant program, application process, and deadlines.

No later than sixty days before the grant application deadline, the BHA and department of public safety shall jointly hold a public meeting to present information about the grant program and to give eligible entities the opportunity to ask questions regarding the grant program. The BHA may allow electronic attendance and participation at the meeting.

The BHA shall provide grant application and program development support upon request to an eligible entity that has an annual budget of less than one million dollars. Available support may include assistance with grant-writing, program design, identifying sustainable funding opportunities, program implementation, and data-gathering and evaluation.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire part added, (SB 22-196), ch. 193, p. 1283, § 2, effective May 19.

27-60-403. Grant program application - criteria - award - rules.

In order to receive a grant, an eligible entity must offer a monetary contribution or in-kind contributions, as described in subsection (4) of this section, that directly support the services provided with a grant award and must submit an application to the BHA. Two or more eligible entities may collaborate on a program and submit a joint application. At a minimum, an application must include:

The requested amount of the grant award and a description of the program that will be operated with the grant award, including a description of how the proposed program meets the purposes of the grant program described in section 27-60-402 (1);

The source of the contributing funds or in-kind contributing resources provided by the applicant, as described in subsection (4) of this section;

Whether the program plans to use the 988 crisis hotline defined in section 27-64-102 as a part of the program;

Information about the applicant's ability and intent to sustain the services provided with a grant award beyond the duration of the grant, if applicable;

A description of any agreements or partnerships necessary to carry out the grant activities and how grant money will be allocated among partners, if needed to perform activities in the application;

Data documenting the need for the project, including the projected demographic information of clients to be served, including age, race, ethnicity, gender, and any other relevant demographic information;

Projected outcomes, specific performance measures, and data collection methods necessary for the grantee and the BHA to assess the impact of the proposed program;

A description of the applicant's experience in providing culturally competent and gender responsive services, and whether the applicant is representative of the individuals the applicant seeks to serve with a grant;

A description of how the program would add value to existing local efforts in the program area, if any, that align with the purposes of this grant program described in section 27-60-402 (1);

A commitment that all services will be provided on a voluntary basis and that the applicant will not require warrant checks or fingerprinting to receive services;

If the applicant is a local government or federally recognized Indian tribe applying for a grant for a capital expenditure, the applicant must demonstrate collaboration with community-based organizations or nonprofit hospitals that are providing treatment and services described in subsection (3) of this section in association with the capital expenditure;

If the applicant is a law enforcement agency, the applicant must demonstrate compliance with the reporting requirements described in section 24-31-903 (2); and

Any other information required by the BHA.

There is created in the BHA an early intervention, deflection, and redirection from the criminal justice system grant review committee to review grant applications and make recommendations to the BHA and department of public safety. The commissioner of the BHA shall ensure that the composition of the committee is racially, ethnically, and geographically diverse and representative of communities most impacted by the criminal justice system. The committee consists of the following members:

The commissioner of the BHA or the commissioner's designee;

The director of the division of criminal justice or the director's designee;

The following individuals appointed by the commissioner of the BHA, in consultation with the director of the division of criminal justice within the department of public safety:

Two clinicians with experience providing behavioral health treatment services to individuals who have been involved in the criminal justice system, one of whom must specialize in substance abuse disorder treatment, who also have experience providing culturally responsive treatment in communities of color and other underserved populations;

Two representatives of organizations with experience awarding grants in behavioral health fields;

A researcher from an institution of higher education with a background in effective interventions that prevent or redirect people with a behavioral health disorder from being involved with the criminal justice system;

A person who was impacted by the criminal justice system, either personally or through a family member, and the person or the family member had behavioral health needs while involved in the criminal justice system;

A victim's advocate with experience in providing culturally responsive services in communities of color, or a representative from a community-based victim services organization that specializes in serving victims of color;

A representative of a federally recognized Indian tribe with jurisdiction in Colorado;

A member of law enforcement that has participated in co-responder community response, as defined in section 24-32-3501 (8);

A public defender or private criminal defense attorney with experience representing people with a behavioral health disorder; and

A prosecutor with experience operating a diversion program specifically for individuals with a behavioral health disorder.

Members of the committee serve without compensation and without reimbursement for expenses. Members of the review committee shall disclose any conflicts of interest, including whether the member represents an organization that may seek a grant from the grant program.

The committee shall review applications for grants submitted pursuant to this section and make recommendations to the BHA and department of public safety about which applicants should receive grants and the amount of each grant.

After receiving and reviewing recommendations from the review committee and after consultation with the department of public safety, the BHA shall award grants. In addition to considering the recommendations of the review committee and after considering the information included in the grant application, when awarding grants, the BHA shall ensure that:

The proposed program fills an existing gap in behavioral health response, as identified in the application, in the program service area and would meet the needs of the identified target population served by the program; and

Any direct services provided through the program will use evidence-based or evidence-informed interventions that align with trauma-informed and harm reduction principles.

The BHA shall only award grants to applicants that offer a monetary contribution or in-kind contributions that directly support the services provided with a grant award. In determining the amount of contributing resources required for an applicant, the BHA shall consider the size of the applicant organization, including available staff and annual operating budget. The BHA may waive the contributing resources requirement for an applicant that is requesting a grant award of less than fifty thousand dollars.

A grant recipient must spend or obligate any grant money in accordance with section 24-75-226 (4)(d).

A grant recipient may use no more than ten percent of a grant award for administrative costs associated with receipt of the grant award.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire part added, (SB 22-196), ch. 193, p. 1285, § 2, effective May 19; (5)(a) amended, (HB 22-1411), ch. 271, p. 1961, § 20, effective May 27.

Editor's note:

Section 24(1)(k) of chapter 271 (HB 22-1411), Session Laws of Colorado 2022, provides that the act changing subsection (5)(a) takes effect only if SB 22-196 becomes law and takes effect either upon the effective date of HB 22-1411 or SB 22-196, whichever is later. SB 22-196 became law and took effect May 19, 2022, and HB 22-1411 took effect May 27, 2022.

27-60-404. Grant program reporting requirements.

Each grant recipient shall submit a report to the BHA following the expiration of the grant term. The report must include:

Information about the use of the grant award, including the program operated with the grant award and the number of individuals the program diverted or redirected from the criminal justice system;

The number of individuals served through the program who may have come into contact with the criminal justice system;

The number of individuals referred by the program to treatment; and

Whether the recipient is continuing the program and any other information requested by the state department.

On or before January 31 of each year, the house of representatives judiciary committee, the house of representatives public and behavioral health and human services committee, the senate health and human services committee, and the senate judiciary committee, or their successor committees, shall hold a joint hearing on the grant program. At the hearing, the state department shall report to the committees about the grant program, which must include an overview of the grant program, information on the type of services funded with a grant award, and where services were provided.

Notwithstanding section 24-1-136 (11)(a)(I), the reporting requirement in this subsection (2) continues indefinitely.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire part added, (SB 22-196), ch. 193, p. 1288, § 2, effective May 19.

27-60-405. Grant program funding - requirements - reports - appropriation.

The general assembly shall appropriate to the state department fifty million seven hundred thousand dollars from the behavioral and mental health cash fund created in section 24-75-230 to implement the grant program.

The state department, BHA, and any person who receives money from the BHA, including each grant recipient, shall comply with the compliance, reporting, record-keeping, and program evaluation requirements established by the office of state planning and budgeting and the state controller in accordance with section 24-75-226 (5).

For each grant awarded for a capital expenditure, the BHA is responsible for preparing the written justification required pursuant to 31 CFR 35.6 (b)(4). A grant applicant that requests grant money for a capital expenditure must submit to the BHA information requested by the BHA for inclusion in the written justification; except that this requirement does not apply if the BHA determines that the written justification is not required based on how the expenditures authorized pursuant to this part 4 will be reported to the United States department of the treasury.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire part added, (SB 22-196), ch. 193, p. 1289, § 2, effective May 19.

27-60-406. Repeal of part.

This part 4 is repealed, effective January 31, 2027.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire part added, (SB 22-196), ch. 193, p. 1289, § 2, effective May 19.